Hawaii statutes.
[§456-21] Failure to authenticate with a
certification statement. (a) A person commits the offense of failure to
authenticate with a certification statement if the person is a commissioned
notary public and knowingly notarizes a document and fails to include any of
the following in the notary certification:

(1) Date of notarization and signature of the notary
public;

(2) The printed name and stamp or seal of the notary
public;

(3) Identification of the jurisdiction in which the
notarial act is performed;

(4) Identification or description of the document
being notarized, placed in close proximity to the acknowledgment or jurat; and

(5) A statement of the number of pages and date of
the document.

(b) Any person who violates this section shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be sentenced in accordance with chapter
706.

(c) A conviction under this section shall
result in the automatic revocation of the notary public's commission. [L 2008,
c 175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next